Connecticut, session 2026, HB05274.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 5-142a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any [high sheriff, chief deputy sheriff, deputy sheriff or special
deputy sheriff] state marshal who suffers death, disability or injury,
while in performance of any duty for which he is compensated by the
state, shall, for the purposes of section 5-142 and chapter 568, be
presumed to be an employee of the state and shall be compensated by
the state in accordance with said section and chapter.
Sec. 2. Section 31-310a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of compensation the average weekly wage of a
supernumerary policeman or state marshal shall be construed to be the
average weekly earnings of production and related workers in
manufacturing in the state as determined by the Labor Commissioner in
accordance with the provisions of section 31-309.
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5274
(b) For the purposes of this section, compensation shall not be
prorated because of other employment by a supernumerary policeman
or state marshal.
(c) For the purpose of determining compensation payable under this
chapter for death, disability or injury incurred by volunteer police
officers, the average weekly wage of such officers shall be the average
production wage in the state as determined by the Labor Commissioner
under the provisions of section 31-309.
Sec. 3. Subsection (l) of section 5-259 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(l) (1) Effective July 1, 1996, any deputies or special deputies
appointed pursuant to section 6-37 of the general statutes, revision of
1958, revised to 1999, or section 6-43, shall be allowed to participate in
the plan or plans procured by the Comptroller pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section. Such participation shall be voluntary and the
participant shall pay the full cost of the coverage under such plan.
(2) (A) Effective October 1, 2025, any state marshal who works as a
state marshal for fewer than twenty hours per week, on average, shall
be allowed to participate in the plan or plans procured by the
Comptroller pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Such
participation shall be voluntary and the participant shall pay the full
cost of the coverage under such plan.
(B) Effective October 1, 2025, any state marshal who (i) works as a
state marshal at least twenty hours per week, on average, on a quarterly
basis, (ii) is actively engaged in either (I) service of process under a
waiver of fees issued pursuant to section 52-259b, (II) service of process
of orders of protection issued pursuant to section 46b-15 or 46b-16a, or
(III) service of capias mittimus orders issued by a family support
magistrate pursuant to section 46b-231, (iii) certifies to those facts in
clauses (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph on forms provided by and filed
with the State Marshal Commission on or before the fifteenth day of
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5274
April, July, October and January for the preceding calendar quarter, and
(iv) does not have access to coverage under a health benefit plan that is
available (I) through the employer of such state marshal's spouse,
provided such health benefit plan has an actuarial value that is
equivalent to or greater than the actuarial value of the plan or plans
procured by the Comptroller pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
and provides similar access to in-network providers as such plan or
plans procured by the Comptroller and is available at an employee
premium share, with respect to each class of coverage, that is not greater
than the premium shares applicable to active state employees in
accordance with the provisions of the State Employees Bargaining
Agent Coalition agreement, or (II) through the municipal employees'
retirement system established by part II of chapter 113 shall be allowed
to participate in the plan or plans procured by the Comptroller pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section. Such participation shall be voluntary
and the participant shall pay the same amount for the coverage under
such plan under the same terms and conditions as active state
employees in accordance with the provisions of the State Employees
Bargaining Agent Coalition agreement.
(C) Any calendar quarter in which a state marshal has been approved
for or received benefits pursuant to chapter 568 or section 5-142 or 31-
49g, such state marshal shall, in a form and manner prescribed by the
State Marshal Commission, submit proof of approval or receipt of such
benefits on or before the fifteenth day of April, July, October and
January. The Comptroller shall accept such proof as compliance with
subparagraphs (B)(i) and (B)(ii).
(3) Effective December 1, 2000, any judicial marshal shall be allowed
to participate in the plan or plans procured by the Comptroller pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section. Such participation shall be voluntary
and the participant shall pay the full cost of the coverage under such
plan unless and until the judicial marshals participate in the plan or
plans procured by the Comptroller under this section through collective
bargaining negotiations pursuant to subsection (f) of section 5-278.
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5274
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 5-142a
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 31-310a
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 5-259(l)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3, Subdivision (4) was moved to Subdivision (2)(C) for clarity.
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4